Washington statutes.
RCW 7.96.100

Scope of protection.

A timely and sufficient correction or clarification made by a person responsible for a publication constitutes a correction or clarification made by all persons responsible for that publication other than a republisher. However, a correction or clarification that is sufficient only because of the operation of RCW 7.96.070(2)(b)(iii) does not constitute a correction or clarification made by the person to whom the statement is attributed.

[ 2013 c 294 s 10.]